California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.

Upon receipt of a preliminary certificate from the commissioner, the society may solicit members for the purpose of completing its organization, shall collect from each applicant the amount of not less than one semiannual payment or six monthly payments, in accordance with its table of rates as provided by its constitution and laws, and shall issue to each such applicant a receipt for the amount so collected. No society shall incur any liability other than for the return of such advance payment, nor issue any certificate, nor pay, allow, or offer or promise to pay or allow any death or disability benefit to any person until:

(a) Actual bona fide applications for death benefits have been secured aggregating at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) on not less than 500 lives.

(b) All such applicants for death benefits shall have been regularly examined by qualified practicing physicians or shall have made acceptable declarations of insurability.

(c) Certificates of examinations or acceptable declarations of insurability meeting the established underwriting standards of the society have been duly filed and approved by the society.

(d) Ten subordinate lodges or branches have been established into which the 500 applicants have been admitted.

(e) There has been submitted to the commissioner, under oath of the president or secretary, or corresponding officer of the society, a list of such applicants, giving their names, addresses, date each was admitted, name and number of the subordinate branch of which each applicant is a member, amount of benefits to be granted and rates therefor.

(f) It shall have been shown to the commissioner, by sworn statement of the treasurer, or corresponding officer of such society, that at least 500 applicants have each paid in cash at least one semiannual payment or six monthly payments as herein provided, which payments in the aggregate shall amount to at least five thousand dollars ($5,000), all of which shall be credited to the fund or funds from which benefits are to be paid, and no part of which may be used for expenses. Said advance payments shall be held in trust during the period of organization and if the organization has not qualified for a certificate of authority within one year or within the extended period, as provided in Section 11012, such payments shall be returned to said applicants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11014.

The commissioner may make such examination and require such further information as he deems advisable. Upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that the society has complied with all the provisions of law, he shall issue to the society a certificate to that effect and that the society is authorized to transact business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of the society at the date of such certificate. The commissioner shall cause a record of such certificate to be made. A certified copy of such record may be given in evidence with like effect as the original certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11015.

Every such society shall have the power to make a constitution and by-laws for the government of the society, the admission of its members, the management of its affairs, and the fixing and readjusting of the rates of its members from time to time. It shall have the power to change, alter, add to or amend such constitution and by-laws and shall have such other powers as are necessary and incidental to carrying into effect the objects and purposes of the society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11016.

A society shall operate for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries by:

(a) Providing benefits under Section 11041, and

(b) Operating for one or more social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious purposes for the benefit of its members, and, if desired, for others. The society’s purposes may be carried out directly by the society or indirectly through subsidiary or affiliated entities established in furtherance of the purposes of the society.

Any incorporated society authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1996, may thereafter exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges prescribed in this chapter and in its charter or articles of incorporation as far as consistent with this chapter. A domestic society shall not be required to reincorporate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11017.

After September 21, 1952, no unincorporated or voluntary association shall be permitted to transact business in this State as a fraternal benefit society under this chapter.

Any domestic voluntary association now authorized to transact business in this State may incorporate when:

(a) It shall have completed its conversion to an incorporated society, not later than one year after the effective date of this chapter;

(b) It has filed its articles of incorporation and has satisfied the other requirements prescribed in this article; and

(c) The commissioner shall have made such examination and procured whatever additional information he shall deem advisable.

Every voluntary association so incorporated shall incur the obligations and enjoy the benefits thereof the same as though originally incorporated, and such corporation shall be deemed a continuation of the original voluntary association. The officers thereof shall serve through their respective terms as provided in its original articles of association, but their successors shall be elected and serve as provided in its articles of incorporation. Incorporation of a voluntary association shall not affect existing suits, claims or contracts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.

Any domestic society may provide that the meetings of its legislative or governing body may be held in any state, district, province or territory wherein such society has at least five subordinate branches, and all business transacted at such meetings shall be as valid in all respects as if such meetings were held in this State. However, its principal office shall be located in this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11019.

A domestic society shall not consolidate or merge with any other society unless it files with the commissioner the papers and evidence specified in this section and pays the sum of three hundred eighty-six dollars ($386) to the commissioner in advance as a filing fee therefor. The papers and evidence herein required to be filed with the commissioner in that instance are:

(a) A certified copy of the written contract containing in full the terms and conditions of the consolidation or merger;

(b) A sworn statement by the president and secretary or corresponding officers of each society showing the financial condition thereof on a date not earlier than December 31, next preceding the
 date of the contract;

(c) A certificate of those officers, duly verified by their respective oaths, that the consolidation or merger has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the supreme legislative or governing body of each society; and

(d) Evidence that at least 60 days prior to the action of the supreme legislative or governing body of each society, the text of the contract has been furnished to all members of the society by being sent by mail or by being published in full in the official organ of the society and the issue containing the text of the contract being mailed to each member of the society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 65.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11020.

If the commissioner finds that such contract is in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, that the financial statements are correct, that under it the interests of the certificate holders of the parties are properly protected and that the consolidation or merger is just and equitable to the members of each society, he shall approve the contract and issue his certificate to such effect. Upon such approval, the contract shall be in full force and effect unless any society which is a party to the contract is incorporated under the laws of any other state or territory. In such event the consolidation or merger shall not become effective unless and until it has been approved as provided by the laws of such state or territory and a certificate of such approval filed with the commissioner of this State or, if the laws of such state or territory contain no such provision, then the consolidation or merger shall not become effective unless and until the supervising insurance official of such state or territory has advised the commissioner that he has no objection to such consolidation or merger.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11021.

Upon the consolidation or merger becoming effective, all the rights, franchises and interests of the consolidated or merged societies in and to every species of property, real, personal or mixed, and things in action thereunto belonging shall be vested in the society resulting from or remaining after the consolidation or merger without any other instrument, except that conveyances of real property may be evidenced by proper deeds, and the title to any real estate or interest therein, vested under the laws of this State in any of the societies consolidated or merged, shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the consolidation or merger, but shall vest absolutely in the society resulting from or remaining after such consolidation or merger.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11022.

The affidavit of any officer of the society or of any one authorized by it to mail any notice or document, stating facts which show that same has been duly addressed and mailed, shall be prima facie evidence that such notice or document has been furnished the addressees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11023.

A society may admit to benefit membership any person not less than 15 years of age at nearest birthday who has been examined by a legally qualified physician, and whose examination has been supervised and approved in accordance with the laws of the society, or who has made declaration of insurability acceptable to the society in accordance with its established underwriting standards. Any such member who shall apply for additional benefits more than six months after becoming a benefit member shall pass an additional medical examination or make an additional declaration of insurability as required by the society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11024.

Any person admitted to benefit membership in such society prior to attaining the full age of 21 years shall be bound by the terms of the application and certificate and by all the laws and rules of the society, and shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges of membership therein, to the same extent as though the age of majority had been attained at the time of application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11025.

A society may accept general or social members who shall have no voice or vote in the management of its insurance affairs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11026.

A domestic society may amend its articles of incorporation, constitution, or laws, in accordance with the provisions thereof, by action of its supreme legislative or governing body at any regular or special meeting. If the articles of incorporation, constitution, or laws so provide, amendment may be made by referendum. A referendum may be held in accordance with the provisions of the society’s articles of incorporation, constitution, or laws by the vote of the voting members of the society, by the vote of delegates or representatives of voting members or by the vote of local lodges or branches. No amendment submitted for adoption by referendum shall be adopted unless, within six months from the date of the amendment’s submission, a majority of the members of the society have signified their consent to the amendment by one of the methods herein specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11027.

No amendment to the articles of incorporation, constitution or laws of any domestic society shall take effect unless approved by the commissioner who shall approve such amendment if he finds that it has been duly adopted and is not inconsistent with any requirement of the laws of this State or with the character, objects and purposes of the society. Unless the commissioner shall disapprove any such amendment within 60 days after the filing of same, such amendment shall be considered approved. The approval or disapproval of the commissioner shall be in writing and mailed to the secretary or corresponding officer of the society at its principal office. In case he disapproves such amendment, the reasons therefor shall be stated in such written notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11028.

Within 90 days from the approval thereof by the commissioner, all such amendments, or a synopsis thereof, shall be furnished to all members of the society either by being published in the official organ of the society or by being sent by mail. The affidavit of any officer of the society or of anyone authorized by it to mail any amendments or synopsis thereof, stating facts which show that same has been duly addressed and mailed, shall be prima facie evidence that such amendments or synopsis thereof have been furnished the addressee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11029.

Every foreign society transacting business under this chapter shall file with the commissioner a duly certified copy of all amendments of, or additions to, its constitution and laws within 90 days after the enactment of the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11030.

Printed copies of the constitution or laws of any domestic or foreign society as amended, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society shall be prima facie evidence of the legal adoption thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11031.

A society may create, maintain and operate hospitals, asylums, homes, sanitariums or other charitable or benevolent institutions for the benefit of its sick, disabled, aged or distressed members and their families and dependents in accordance with the provisions of its laws; and for such purpose it may own, hold or lease personal property or real property located within or without this State, with necessary buildings thereon. Such property shall not be deemed an admitted asset of the society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11032.

Maintenance, treatment and proper attendance in any such institution may be furnished free or a reasonable charge may be made therefor, but no such institution shall be operated for profit. Excepting a society relieved of the requirement of maintaining a separation of funds pursuant to the provisions of Section 11120, no part of the cost or expense of creating, maintaining or operating such institution shall be defrayed or paid out of the mortuary, sick or disability funds of a society. The society shall maintain a separate accounting of any disbursements under this section and report them in its annual statement. No society shall own or operate funeral homes or undertaking establishments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11033.

A society maintaining special funds of the nature set forth in Section 11122 may make payments from such funds to its members compatible with the type thereof; provided that, if such payments are of such a nature that they could constitute benefits within the classes of insurance set forth in Section 11041, the society making such payments may not:

(a) Make any separate charge therefor;

(b) Issue any certificate, policy or other document promising such payments; 

(c) Provide in its constitution, by-laws or any other document that such payments may be received by any member of such society as a matter of right; nor

(d) Advertise such payments as insurance or as payments to which the member has any right.

No such special funds shall be an admitted asset of the society in excess of the amount of the liabilities of such special fund. The society shall maintain a separate accounting of any disbursements under this section and report them in its annual statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Benefits [11040. - 11044.]

11040.

All benefits provided for in the laws and agreements of a society shall be payable only out of its funds in accordance with its laws. The officers and members of the supreme, grand or any subordinate body of a society shall not be individually liable therefor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11041.

An admitted society may, by the issuance of certificates, provide for payment to its members of insurance benefits contained within the following classes:

(a) All forms of life insurance, as defined in Section 101, except group insurance and funeral insurance as defined in Section 10240.

(b) All forms of disability insurance, as defined in Section 106, except group insurance.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, benefits may be paid in any manner compatible with their nature.

Any benefits authorized in this section, or combinations thereof, may be provided in the same or separate certificates.

A society shall specify in its laws or rules those persons who may receive benefits or be covered by benefits through the society. For all coverages, the member shall be the applicant or the insured provided that if the member is the applicant, there shall be a bona fide familial or other dependent relationship between the member and the insured or beneficiary. Every society, by its constitution, laws, or rules, may limit the scope of beneficiaries only to the extent required by federal law governing fraternal benefit societies. The society may specify the terms and conditions on which benefit certificates may be assigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11042.

A society may provide for benefits on the lives of children under 21 years of age and under the minimum age for adult membership under the laws of the society at time of application therefor, upon the application of some adult person, as its laws or rules may provide, which benefits shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 11041. A society may, at its option, organize and operate branches for such children. Membership and initiation in local lodges shall not be required of such children, nor shall they have a voice in the management of the society. Children insured under certificates issued pursuant to this section may be transferred to and become members of the adult branch of the society upon attaining the minimum age for adult membership under the laws of the society.

If a society maintains a separate juvenile fund, it shall have the right to provide in its laws or rules for the payment to the society’s expense or general fund; provided, that no such society shall transfer to such funds amounts collected for juvenile mortuary benefits and the net accretions thereto. A society shall have full power to provide for the fixing and readjusting, from time to time, of the premiums and the designation and changing of designation of beneficiaries and to provide in all other respects for the regulation, government and control of such certificates and all rights, obligations and liabilities incident thereto and in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

11043.

A society may grant nonforfeiture benefits, cash surrender values, certificate loans, and other options as its laws may permit.

In the case of certificates issued after September 21, 1952, other than those for which reserves are computed on the Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the 1941 Standard Industrial Table, the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or any more recent table approved by the commissioner that applies to life insurers, the value of any nonforfeiture benefit granted and the amount of any cash surrender value granted shall not be less than the excess, if any, of (a) over (b) as follows:

(a) The reserve under the certificate determined on the basis specified in the certificate; and

(b) The sum of any indebtedness to the society on the certificate, including interest due and accrued, and a surrender charge of not more than 212 percent of the face amount of the certificate, which, in the case of insurance on the lives of children, shall be the ultimate face amount of the certificate, if death benefits provided therein are graded.

However, in the case of certificates issued on a substandard basis or in the case of certificates, the reserves for which are computed upon the American Men Ultimate Table of Mortality, the term of any extended insurance benefit including accompanying pure endowment, if any, may be computed upon the rates of mortality not greater than 130 percent of those shown by the mortality table specified in the certificate for the computation of the reserve.

In the case of certificates issued after September 21, 1952, for which reserves are computed on the Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the 1941 Standard Industrial Table, the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or any more recent table approved by the commissioner that applies to life insurers, the value of any nonforfeiture benefit granted and the amount of any cash surrender value granted shall not be less than the corresponding amount ascertained in accordance with the provisions of Sections 10161, 10162, 10163, 10163.1, 10163.2, 10164, 10164.1, and 10165 applicable to life insurance companies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11044.

No beneficiary shall have or obtain any vested interest in the proceeds of any certificate until the certificate has become due and payable in conformity with the provisions of the insurance contract. The owner of a certificate shall have the right at all times to change the beneficiary or beneficiaries in accordance with the constitution, laws, or rules of the society, unless the owner waives this right by specifically requesting in writing that the beneficiary designation be irrevocable. Every society, by its constitution, laws, or rules, may limit the scope of beneficiaries only to the extent required by federal law governing fraternal benefit societies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Contract [11060. - 11073.]

11060.

Every society authorized to do business in this State shall issue to each benefit member a certificate specifying the amount of benefits provided thereby. The certificate, together with any riders or endorsements attached thereto, the charter or articles of incorporation, the constitution and laws of the society, the application for membership, and declaration of insurability, if any, signed by the applicant, and all amendments to each thereof, shall constitute the entire agreement between the society and the member, and the certificate shall so state. A copy of the application for membership and of the declaration of insurability, if any, shall be endorsed upon or attached to the certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11061.

All statements purporting to be made by the member shall, in the absence of fraud, be representations and not warranties. Any waiver of this provision shall be void.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11062.

Any changes, additions or amendments to the charter or articles of incorporation, constitution or laws duly made or enacted subsequent to the issuance of the certificate, shall bind the member and the beneficiaries, and shall govern and control the agreement in all respects the same as though such changes, additions or amendments had been made prior to and were in force at the time of the application for membership, but no such changes, additions or amendments shall have the effect of terminating or reducing the benefit or benefits payable under any certificate in force at the time such changes, additions or amendments become effective.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11063.

Copies of any of the documents mentioned in Sections 11060 and 11062, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society, shall be received in evidence of the terms and conditions thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11064.

A society shall provide specifically in its certificates that if its reserves become impaired, its board of directors or corresponding body may require that the owner pay to the society the amount of the owner’s equitable proportion of the deficiency as ascertained by its board, and that if the payment be not made it shall stand as an indebtedness against the certificate and draw interest not to exceed the rate specified for certificate loans under the certificate, or if none is specified, 6 percent per annum compounded annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11065.

Every society authorized to do business in this State shall provide in its constitution or laws that additional payments or contributions shall be required of members by the action of the board of directors or corresponding body of the society whenever they deem it necessary or proper to effectuate the carrying on of the insurance business of the society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11066.

After the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature, no life insurance benefit certificate may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless a copy of the form, the application therefor, and any attached endorsements or riders have been filed with the commissioner in the same manner as policies, contracts, or certificates of life insurance issued by stock or mutual insurers. The certificate shall have a title clearly and correctly describing its form on the face and filing back and shall contain in substance the standard provisions listed below. However, the commissioner may approve any form that in his or her opinion contains provisions relating to any one or more of the following requirements that are more favorable to insured members than the one or ones required here.

(a) A provision stating the amount of premiums that are payable under the certificate, and a provision that the certificate holder shall be obligated to pay, as a condition of the continuance in force of the certificate, additional premiums imposed in accordance with the constitution or laws of the society then in force or thereafter lawfully enacted.

(b) A provision that the certificate holder is entitled to a grace of not less than a full month (or 30 days at the option of the society) in which the payment of any premium, after the first, may be made, and that during the grace period, the certificate shall continue in full force. However, the certificate may provide that in case a loss occurs during the grace period before the overdue premium is paid, the amount of the overdue premium or premiums may be deducted in any settlement under the certificate.

(c) A provision that the certificate holder shall be entitled to have the certificate reinstated at any time within three years from the date of default in payment of premiums, unless the certificate has been completely terminated through the application of a nonforfeiture benefit, upon the production of evidence of insurability and good health satisfactory to the society and the payment of all overdue premiums and any other indebtedness to the society upon the certificate, together with interest on the premiums and indebtedness, if any, at a rate not exceeding 6 percent per annum compounded annually. However, a society may provide for a minimum interest payment of not exceeding ten cents ($0.10) for each month’s premium in arrears at the date of reinstatement, if the premiums do not exceed 12 in number.

(d) A provision that, in the event of default in payment of any premium after three full years’ premiums have been paid, or after premiums for a lesser period have been paid if the contract so provides, the society will grant, upon proper request not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default, a nonforfeiture benefit on the plan stipulated in the certificate, effective as of the due date, of the value as specified in this chapter. This subdivision does not apply to pure endowment, annuity or reversionary annuity contracts, or term certificates of uniform amount, or renewal thereof, of 15 years or less expiring before age 66, for which uniform premiums are payable during the entire term of the certificate, or term certificates of decreasing amount on which the granting of a nonforfeiture benefit is not required in order to comply with the minimum values specified in this chapter.

(e) A provision that one nonforfeiture benefit, as specified in the certificate, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (d) above, shall become effective automatically unless the member elects another available nonforfeiture benefit or, if society makes available a cash surrender value, the cash surrender value, not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default.

(f) A statement of the mortality table and rate of interest used in determining all nonforfeiture benefits and cash surrender values available under the certificate. After September 21, 1954, a brief general statement of the method used in calculating the benefits and values available under the certificate on any certificate anniversary beyond the last anniversary for which the benefits and values are consecutively shown in the certificate. The statement shall be accompanied by an explanation of the manner in which the benefits and values are altered by the existence of paid-up additions credited to the certificate or by any indebtedness to the society on the certificate.

(g) A table showing in figures every nonforfeiture benefit and cash surrender value available under the certificate for each certificate anniversary either during the first 20 certificate years or during the term of the certificate, whichever is shorter, the benefits and values to be calculated upon the assumption that there are no dividends or paid-up additions credited to the certificate and that there is no indebtedness to the society on account of or secured by the certificate.

(h) A provision that the certificate shall be incontestable after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for a period of two years from its date of issue except for nonpayment of premiums, risks limited or not assumed, violation of the provisions of the certificate relating to military, aviation, or naval service, or violation of the provisions relating to suspension or expulsion as substantially set forth in the certificate. At the option of the society, supplemental provisions relating to benefits in the event of temporary or permanent disability or hospitalization and provisions that grant additional insurance specifically against death by accident or accidental means, may also be excepted. The certificate shall be incontestable on the ground of suicide after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for a period of two years from date of issue. The certificate may provide, as to statements made to procure reinstatement, that the society has the right to contest a reinstated certificate within a period of two years from date of reinstatement with the same exceptions as provided here.

(i) A provision that if it shall be found at any time before final settlement under the certificate that the age or sex of the insured (or the age or sex of any other person, if considered in determining the premium) has been misstated, and the discrepancy and the premium payment involved have not been adjusted, the amount payable under the certificate shall be such as the premium would have purchased at the correct age and sex. However, if the correct age was not an insurable age under the society’s charter, constitution, or bylaws, only the premiums paid to the society, less any payments previously made to the member, shall be returned. Alternatively, at the option of the society, the amount payable under the certificate shall be that which the premiums would have purchased at the correct age and sex according to the society’s promulgated rates and any extension thereof based upon actuarial principles.

(j) A provision or provisions that recite fully, or that set forth the substance of, all sections of the charter, constitution, laws, rules or regulations of the society, in force at the time of issuance of the certificate, the violation of which will result in the termination of, or in the reduction of, the benefit or benefits payable under the certificate.

Any of the foregoing provisions or portions thereof not applicable by reason of the plan of insurance may, to the extent inapplicable, be omitted from the certificate. The word “premiums” as used in this section means premiums, rates, or other required contributions by whatever name known.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11067.

After September 21, 1952, no life insurance benefit certificate shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this State containing in substance any of the following provisions:

(a) Any provision limiting the time within which any action at law or in equity may be commenced to less than 18 months after the cause of action shall accrue.

(b) Any provision by which the certificate shall purport to be issued or take effect more than six months before the original application for the certificate was made, except in case of transfer from one form of certificate to another in connection with which the member is to receive credit for any reserve accumulation under the form of certificate from which the transfer is made.

(c) Any provision for forfeiture of the certificate for failure to repay any loan thereon or to pay interest on such loan while the total indebtedness, including interest, is less than the loan value of the certificate.

(d) Any provision whereby the suspension or expulsion of the member, or change of occupation, or any other violation of the terms and conditions of the contract shall result in the loss or reduction of the cash surrender value or other withdrawal equity, if any, available by the terms of such certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11068.

After September 21, 1954, no life insurance benefit certificate shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this State containing in substance any provision limiting the time within which any action at law or in equity may be commenced to less than two years after the cause of action shall accrue.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11069.

No domestic, foreign or alien society authorized to do business in this State shall issue or deliver in this State any certificate or other evidence of any contract for temporary or permanent disability benefits as a result of disease or accident, or for hospital, medical or nursing benefits, unless and until the form thereof, together with the form of application and all riders or endorsements for use in connection therewith, shall have been filed with the commissioner and approved by him as conforming to reasonable rules and regulations from time to time made by him and as not inconsistent with any other provisions of law applicable thereto. The commissioner shall, within a reasonable time after the filing of any such form, notify the society filing the same either of his approval or of his disapproval of such form. The commissioner may approve any such form which in his opinion contains provisions on any one or more of the several requirements made by him which are more favorable to the insured members than the one or ones so required. The action of the commissioner in disapproving any such form shall be subject to judicial review. Pursuant to the foregoing provisions, the commissioner shall have power, from time to time, to make, alter and supersede reasonable regulations prescribing the required, optional and prohibited provisions in such contracts, and such regulations shall conform, as far as practicable, to the provisions of this code relating to similar contracts issued by other insurers. Where the commissioner deems inapplicable, either in part or in their entirety, the provisions of this code relating to similar contracts issued by other insurers, he may prescribe the portions or summary thereof of the contract to be printed on the certificate issued to the member. All rules and regulations made, altered or superseded by the commissioner pursuant to the authority granted in this section shall be in accordance with Chapter 4 of Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

11070.

After September 21, 1954, no action at law or in equity shall be had or maintained on any certificate or contract issued by a society unless commenced within two years after the cause of action shall accrue.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11071.
